ru: Бизнес и промышленность > Медицина > Медицинские инструменты > Медицинские зажимы и пинцеты: Перевязочные пинцеты; Кровоостанавливающие зажимы; Пинцеты для извлечения осколков; Пинцеты для мягких тканей
sl-SI: Posel in industrija > Zdravstvo > Medicinski instrumenti > Medicinske klešče: Medicinske pincete; Hemostatske klešče; Klešče za tujke; Klešče za tkiva
ro-RO: Afaceri și sectorul industrial > Sectorul medical > Instrumente medicale > Pensă medicală: Pensă pentru pansamente; Pensă hemostatică; Pensă așchii; Pensă pentru țesuturi
zh-CN: 商业/工业 > 医疗 > 医疗仪器 > 医用钳子: 敷料钳; 止血钳; 取裂片钳; 组织钳
lt-LT: Verslas ir pramonė > Medicina > Medicinos instrumentai > Medicininės žnyplės: Tvarstymo žnyplės; Hemostatinės žnyplės; Svetimkūnių šalinimo žnyplės; Audinių žnyplės
de: Wirtschaft & Industrie > Medizinischer Bereich > Medizinische Instrumente > Medizinische Zangen: Verbandszangen; Hämostatische Pinzette; Splitterpinzetten; Gewebezangen
bg-BG: Бизнес и промишленост > Медицински > Медицински инструменти > Медицински форцепси: Форцепс за превръзки; Хемостатични форцепси; Форцепси сплинтер; Форцепси за тъкани
ja: ビジネス・産業 > 医療 > 医療用器具 > 鉗子: ドレッシングピンセット; 止血鉗子; 破片鉗子; 組織鉗子
sv: Företag och industri > Sjukvård > Medicinska instrument > Medicinsk tång: Förbandspincett; Hemostatisk pincett; Splintertpincett; Vävnadspincett
es: Economía e industria > Productos médicos > Instrumentos médicos > Fórceps médicos: Fórceps para vendas; Fórceps hemostáticos; Pinzas para astillas; Fórceps para tejidos
tr: İş ve Endüstri > Medikal > Tıbbi Aletler > Medikal Forsepsler: Pansuman Forsepsleri; Hemostatik Forseps; Kıymık Forsepsleri; Doku Forsepsi
ko: 비즈니스/산업 > 의료 > 의료 기구 > 의료용 겸자: 드레싱 겸자; 지혈 겸자; 스플린터 겸자; 조직 겸자
da: Erhverv og industri > Medicinsk > Medicinske instrumenter > Medicinske pincetter: Forbindingspincetter; Hæmostatiske pincetter; Splinterpincetter; Vævspincetter
pl: Biznes i przemysł > Branża medyczna > Instrumenty medyczne > Kleszcze medyczne: Kleszcze do opatrunków; Kleszcze hemostatyczne; Kleszczyki do odłamków; Kleszcze tkankowe
en: Business & Industrial > Medical > Medical Instruments > Medical Forceps: Dressing Forceps; Hemostatic Forceps; Splinter Forceps; Tissue Forceps
nl: Zakelijk en industrieel > Medisch > Medische instrumenten > Medische tang: Verbandtang; Hemostatische tang; Splintertang; Weefseltang
nb: Forretninger og industri > Medisinsk > Medisinske instrumenter > Medisinske tenger: Forbindingstenger; Hemostatiske tenger; Splinttenger; Vevtenger
hu: Üzlet és ipar > Orvosi > Orvosi műszerek > Orvosi csipeszek: Öltözködési csipeszek; Vérzéscsillapító csipeszek; Szilánkos csipeszek; Szövet csipeszek
el: Επιχειρηματικός & βιομηχανικός εξοπλισμός > Ιατρικά είδη > Ιατρικά όργανα > Ιατρικές λαβίδες: Λαβίδες επιδέσμων; Αιμοστατικές λαβίδες; Λαβίδες για αγκίστρωση ξένων σωμάτων; Λαβίδες ιστών
pt-PT: Business e industrial > Médico > Instrumentos médicos > Fórceps médicos: Fórceps de curativo; Fórceps hemostáticos; Fórceps de fragmentos; Fórceps de tecido
zh-TW: 商業與各產業 > 醫療業 > 醫療器材 > 醫療用鉗子: 敷料鉗; 止血鉗; 碎片拔除器; 組織鉗
hr-HR: Posao i industrija > Medicina > Medicinski instrumenti > Medicinske škare: Škare za zavoje; Hemostatske škare; Škarice za vađenje iverice; Pincete za tkivo
sk-SK: Obchod a priemysel > Zdravotníctvo > Lekárske nástroje > Lekárske kliešte: Chirurgické nožnice; Hemostatické kliešte; Pinzety; Chirurgické kliešte na tkanivá
pt-BR: Comercial e industrial > Medicina > Instrumentos médicos > Fórceps: Pinça de curativo; Pinça hemostática; Pinça de fragmentação; Pinça de tecido
it: Commercio e industria > Medicina > Strumenti medici > Forcipi medici: Forcipi per medicazione; Forcipi emostatici; Pinze per schegge; Pinze per tessuti
fr: Entreprise et industrie > Secteur médical > Instruments médicaux > Forceps: Forceps à pansement; Forceps hémostatique; Forceps à échardes; Forceps à tissus
fi: Yritys ja teollisuus > Lääketiede > Lääketieteelliset instrumentit > Lääketieteelliset pihdit: Harsopihdit; Hemostaattiset pihdit; Tikkupihdit; Kudospihdit
th: ธุรกิจและอุตสาหกรรม > การแพทย์ > เครื่องมือทางการแพทย์ > คีมของแพทย์: ปากคีบ; คีมหนีบเส้นเลือด; คีมคีบปลายแหลม; คีมจับเนื้อเยื่อ
vi: Kinh doanh & Công nghiệp > Y tế > Dụng cụ y tế > Kẹp/nhíp y tế: Kẹp/nhíp thay băng; Kẹp cầm máu; Kẹp/nhíp gắp mảnh vụn; Kẹp mô
cs: Obchod a průmysl > Zdravotnictví > Lékařské nástroje > Lékařské kleště: Obvazové pinzety; Hemostatické pinzety; Pinzety na třísky; Tkáňové pinzety